Arkansas statutes. Title 21 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 5

Compensation and Benefits

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

21-5-101. Regular Salary Procedures and Restrictions Act.

This section and §19-4-1601 shall be known as and may be cited as the “Regular Salary Procedures and Restrictions Act”.

Arkansas Constitution, Article 16, § 4, provides: “Except as provided in Arkansas Constitution, Article 19, § 31, the General Assembly shall fix the salaries and fees of all officers in the State; and no greater salary or fee than that fixed by law shall be paid to any officer, employee, or other person, or at any rate other than par value; and the number and salaries of the clerks and employees of the different departments of the State shall be fixed by law.” Therefore, the following provisions shall be applicable to all authorized regular salary positions in appropriation acts unless specific exception is made otherwise by law:

History.

Acts 1973, No. 284, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-1601.1, 12-1601.2; Acts 2009, No. 688, § 2; 2019, No. 390, § 3.

21-5-102. Automobile insurance expenses for employees of Department of Health.

The Department of Health is authorized to pay from maintenance and operation appropriations of either state or federal funds, as reimbursement of actual costs to any regular and full-time employee of the Department of Health, the excess cost to the employee for insurance coverage needed because of employee use of a personal vehicle to transport, as a part of his or her regular duty, individuals, clients, or patients, who are not state employees and who participate in Department of Health programs at clinics, hospitals, doctors' offices, and other locations designated by the Department of Health.

Proof of actual excess cost must be furnished by the employee at the time of request for reimbursement and amount of reimbursement will not exceed the maximum amount as stated in the early periodic screening and diagnosis and treatment contract with the Department of Human Services.

All other costs to an employee for operating a personal vehicle on state business will be considered to be covered by the approved reimbursement rate per mile as prescribed in state travel rules promulgated by the Department of Finance and Administration.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 223, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-1605.1; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 2321.

21-5-103. Insufficient funds for payment of county salaries.

If, in any year, the funds available for the payment of salaries of elected county officers and employees of a county are inadequate to pay all such salaries and it becomes necessary to reduce salaries, the salary of each elected constitutional officer and each employee in the county shall be reduced in the same percentage.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 568, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-1627.

21-5-104. Deduction of jury duty fees from salary prohibited.

No state, county, or municipal employer in this state shall deduct from the usual compensation of any employee, all or any part of the fees or compensation received by the employee for appearing for grand or petit jury duty or serving on any grand or petit jury in any court in this state.

Any state, county, or municipal employer who shall violate the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction therefor shall be fined not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) nor more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

A violation shall constitute grounds for dismissal of the employer from his or her office or position of public employment.

A.C.R.C. Notes. This section has been renumbered as §21-1-103 by Acts 1991, No. 786, § 34.

To receive the full amount authorized in subsection (c) of this section, the service shall have been in either elected positions or regular full-time positions.

Employees who work part-time in regular salary positions may receive annual career service recognition payments on a pro rata basis.

Periods of authorized leave without pay and leave of absence for military service when veterans' reemployment rights are exercised shall not negate eligibility for the payment, provided all other eligibility requirements are met.

The Office of Personnel Management shall establish and publish policies and procedures for the administration of career service recognition payments to state employees upon a determination by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services that sufficient funds are available for such purpose.

An employee who meets eligibility requirements established by subsection (a) of this section shall become eligible for annual career service recognition payments on the anniversary date of the completion of such service according to the following schedule:

Career service recognition payments authorized by this section shall be:

Subject to withholding of all applicable state and federal taxes; and

Included by retirement systems in determining benefits.

Amendments. The 1999 amendment inserted “either elected positions or” twice in (a); and made stylistic changes.

The 2009 amendment, in (a)(1), substituted “To receive the full amount authorized in subsection (c) of this section” for “However” in (a)(1)(B), and inserted (a)(1)(C).

The 2017 amendment, in (a)(1)(A), deleted “and nonfaculty employees of institutions of higher education” following “agencies” and substituted “a state agency” for “an agency or institution of the State of Arkansas”.

The 2019 amendment by No. 914 , in (c), substituted “$800” for “$600”, “1,000” for “700”, “1,200” for “800”, and “1,500” for “900”.

The 2019 amendment by No. 981 inserted “and the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services” in (b).

Candidate could not run for both city treasurer and justice of the peace, even though the candidate would only receive compensation for one office, because the elections for each office were held on the same day, so the candidate was statutorily barred from holding both offices, regardless of compensation.Roberson v. Phillips County Election Comm'n, 2014 Ark. 480, 449 S.W.3d 694 (2014).

History.

Acts 1969, No. 86, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-1615, 12-1616.

21-5-105. [Transferred.]

(1)(A)Employees of state agencies shall become eligible for annual career service recognition payments upon completion of ten (10) or more years of service in either elected positions or classified or nonclassified positions with a state agency.

STATE SERVICE ANNUAL PAYMENT 10 through 14 years of state service $
800 15 through 19 years of state service
1,000 20 through 24 years of state service
1,200 25 or more years of state service
1,500

Click to view table.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 882, §§ 1-4; 1991, No. 566, § 1; 1995, No. 490, § 1; 1999, No. 882, § 2; 2007, No. 386, § 1; 2007, No. 799, § 1; 2009, No. 688, § 3; 2017, No. 365, § 7; 2019, No. 914, § 1; 2019, No. 981, § 1.

21-5-107. Compensation of person holding more than one elective office.

(1)A person holding more than one (1) elective office shall be entitled to receive compensation from only one (1) of the offices held.

The person shall select the office from which he or she may receive compensation by filing a statement with the Secretary of State and the disbursing officer of each governmental entity in which he or she holds an elective office.

For the purpose of this section:

“Compensation” means all salaries, retirement allowances, group insurance, medical benefits, and anything else of value that a governmental entity provides in return for the services of its officers; and

“Elective office” means any office created by or under authority of the laws of the State of Arkansas, or of a subdivision thereof, that is filled by the voters, except a federal office.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 767, § 1.

21-5-108. Salary distributions.

The annual salaries of court reporters and case coordinators shall be paid in twenty-four (24) equal semimonthly installments.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1295, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes. As enacted by Acts 2001, No. 1295, § 1, this section began:

“Effective July 1, 2001,”.

Pursuant to Acts 2015, No. 268, the salaries of court reporters and trial court administrators (formerly known as case coordinators) are determined by the Administrative Office of the Courts. See §16-13-501 et seq., and §16-13-3301 et seq., respectively.